Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Charter Schools

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 189, § 1, and Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1, both enacted article 3 in chapter 3 in this title. The provisions enacted by Laws 2001, ch. 189, pertaining to reading assessment and intervention, have been redesignated as article 4 (§

21-3-401

).

Laws 2021, ch. 157, § 2, provides: "Notwithstanding
W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

as created and amended by sections 1 and 2 of this act, not more than three (3) charter schools shall be authorized by an entity that is not the school district board until the state superintendent of public instruction reviews the impacts and benefits of charter schools and provides a report to the joint education interim committee recommending that additional charter schools should be authorized under the process implemented in this act and the legislature acts to repeal this section."

§ 21-3-301.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this article to provide opportunities for teachers, parents, pupils and community members to establish and maintain schools that operate independently from existing school districts as a method to:

Improve pupil learning;

Increase learning opportunities for all pupils, with special emphasis on expanded learning experiences;

Encourage the use of different and innovative teaching methods;

Create new professional opportunities for teachers, including the opportunity to be responsible for the learning program at the school site; and

Provide parents and pupils with expanded choices in the types of educational opportunities that are available within the public school system.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2022, substituted "districts" for "district structure" in (a) and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

National teacher certification program. —

Laws 2005, ch. 178, § 3, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates $182,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education for school year 2005-2006 to supplement amounts available under § 21-22-106(a)(iii) to districts for reimbursements to teachers for actual costs of national certification fees as provided under §

21-7-501

. A charter school operating within the district pursuant to §§

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

and employing teachers otherwise qualifying under §

21-7-501

is entitled to reimbursements under this section. In addition and notwithstanding limits imposed under § 21-7-501(a), the department, in consultation with the Wyoming professional teaching standards board, is to expend the appropriated funds, together with any funds received from private sources, to: (1) increase recruitment of teacher applicants for national certification; (2) establish a support system for teachers while in the process of obtaining national certification; and (3) provide awards and public recognition for teachers receiving national certification. Not later than July 1, 2006, the department is to report expenditures of amounts appropriated under this section to the joint education interim committee, and recommend any necessary modification to the national certification program established by § 21-7-501.

Cited

in

Laramie County Sch. Dist. #2 v. Albin Cats Charter Sch., Inc., 2005 WY 43,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 49

, 109 P.3d 552 (2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statute or regulation governing charter schools, 78 ALR5th 533.

§ 21-3-302.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“A charter school within a school” means a charter school operating within a facility or portion of a facility currently operated by the district as a public school or operated as an adjunct to a public school or schools with students attending both the charter school and the public school;

“A converted charter school” means a charter school converted from an existing public school operating within the district;

“District board” means the board of trustees of a school district elected as the governing body of the school district;

“New charter school” or “charter school” means a public school established and operating under the terms of a charter contract between the charter school’s board and its authorizer;

“School district” means each school district now or hereafter legally organized as a body corporate pursuant to W.S.

21-3-101

, et seq.;

“State board” means the state board of education appointed pursuant to W.S.

21-2-301

.

“Authorizer” means a school district board or the state loan and investment board;

“Charter” or “charter contract” means the charter contract executed between a charter school and an authorizer;

“Charter application” means the application submitted by a proposed charter school to an authorizer for the creation of a charter school;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of education;

“Education service provider” means a for-profit or nonprofit education management organization, charter management organization, or any other partner entity that a charter school contracts with for educational program implementation or for comprehensive management.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2022, rewrote (a)(iv), which read, "'New charter school' means a charter school established within the district which is located in a facility or a portion of a facility which is not currently being operated by the district as a public school"; and added (a)(vii) through (a)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-3-302.1.
Charter school authorizers.

Authorizers shall:

Review charter school applications made to the authorizer and make a written determination on the application;

Monitor charter schools approved by the authorizer;

Make decisions on the renewal, nonrenewal and revocation of charters granted by the authorizer.

Funding for authorizers shall consist of administrative fees collected from the charter school. Fees shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the charter school’s annual state funding.

The state loan and investment board shall, subject to the limitation in subsection (b) of this section, establish administration fees necessary to recover the incremental costs of the department of education related to the approval and monitoring of charter schools under this article. Administrative fees collected by the state loan and investment board pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the school foundation program account.

History.

2021 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 169, § 7, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 21-3-303.
Charter school prohibitions.

This article shall not prohibit any private person or organization from funding or providing other assistance for the establishment or operation of a charter school established pursuant to this article.

No charter shall be granted under this article if it is determined that its sole purpose is to avoid consolidation or closure of any school or district. For purposes of this subsection, consolidation or closure applies regardless of grade configuration, building location or school or district name.

No charter application shall be considered from any person, group or organization proposing to convert a private school or a nonpublic home-based educational program into a charter school.

No charter school shall enter into a contract with an independent management company or education service provider without the prior written consent of the authorizer.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 169, § 4.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2003, ch. 208, § 901; 2007, ch. 84, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (e).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, deleted "when the district board determines the funding or assistance is compatible with the mission of the district" at the end of (a); in (d), added "or education service provider" and substituted "authorizer" for "district board. The school district shall be a third party beneficiary to any management contract approved by the district board."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (e), which read, "For applications filed on and after July 1, 2007, a charter application shall not be considered from any person, group or organization that has previously filed a charter application within a twelve (12) month period and the application was subsequently denied. Computation of the twelve (12) month period under this subsection shall begin on the date the denied application was filed with the district board."

Decision that application made for sole purpose of avoiding closure not supported by factual findings. —

Application to run a charter school that was denied by the district school board was properly remanded to the board because the fact that a motion did not pass did not support the board's conclusion that the application was made for the sole purpose of avoiding the school closure. Laramie County Sch. Dist. #2 v. Albin Cats Charter Sch., Inc., 2005 WY 43, 109 P.3d 552,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 21-3-304.
Charter school; requirements; authority.

A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, nonreligious, nonhome-based school which operates within a public school district. Tuition shall not be charged by a charter school to any student in grades kindergarten through twelve (12).

If a charter is granted by a school district, the charter school shall be a public school within the school district that grants its charter. If a charter is granted by the state loan and investment board, the charter school shall be an independent public school within the district where the charter school is located. The charter school shall be accountable to its authorizer for purposes of ensuring compliance with applicable laws and charter provisions and the requirements of the state constitution.

A charter school shall be subject to all federal and state laws and constitutional provisions prohibiting discrimination on the basis of disability, race, creed, color, gender, national origin, religion, ancestry or need for special education services. Enrollment decisions shall be made in a nondiscriminatory manner specified by the charter school applicant in the charter school application. Enrollment decisions shall not discriminate against at-risk students or special program students. A charter school specializing in at-risk or special education students may give a preference in enrollment to those students. A charter school sponsored jointly or separately by the Eastern Shoshone or the Northern Arapaho Indian Tribes may give preference to a student who is a member or eligible for membership in an Indian tribe.

A charter school shall be administered and governed by a governing body in a manner agreed to by the charter school applicant and the authorizer. A charter school may organize as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, which shall not affect its status as a public school for any purposes under Wyoming law. A charter school organized by a school district may include school board members or school district employees on its governing board.

A charter school, as a public school, is a governmental entity. Direct leases and financial obligations of a charter school shall not constitute debt or financial obligations of the authorizer unless the authorizer expressly assumes the obligations in writing.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article to the contrary, a charter school and the authorizer may agree to extend the length of the charter beyond five (5) years.

A charter school may operate free from specified school district policies and state regulations. Pursuant to contract, a school district may waive locally imposed school district requirements, without seeking approval of the state board. The state board may waive state statutory requirements or rules promulgated by the state board, except that the state board shall not waive any statute or rule relating to the assessments or standards required to be administered. Upon request of the charter applicant, the state board shall provide summaries of such regulations and policies to use in preparing a charter school application. The department of education shall prepare the summary of state regulations within existing appropriations. Any waiver of state or local school district regulations made pursuant to this subsection shall be for the term of the charter for which the waiver is made, except that a waiver of state statutes or regulations by the state board shall be subject to review every two (2) years and may be revoked if the waiver is deemed no longer necessary by the state board. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to exempt the charter school from:

Any civil rights, health or safety requirements applicable to other public schools in the state except as specifically provided in this article;

The student assessment and accountability requirements applicable to other public schools, provided that this paragraph shall not prohibit a charter school from establishing additional student assessment measures;

The public records act and public meeting requirements applicable to public schools and school districts and any federal or state privacy laws applicable to public schools or school districts.

A charter school shall be responsible for its own operation including, but not limited to, preparation of a budget, contracting for services and personnel matters.

A charter school may negotiate and contract with a school district, the governing body of a community college or the university of Wyoming, or any third party for the use of a school building and grounds, the operation and maintenance thereof, and the provision of any service, activity or undertaking that the charter school is required to perform in order to carry out the educational program described in its charter. Any services for which a charter school contracts with a school district shall be provided by the district at the incremental cost. For school district capital facilities that are rented at the time of the charter school application and had been rented for the immediately preceding six (6) months by a third party, the net loss of rental income shall be considered an incremental cost. The charter school shall have standing to sue and be sued in its own name for the enforcement of any contract created pursuant to this subsection.

Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, a charter school shall not be required to pay rent for space which is deemed available, as negotiated by contract, in school district facilities. All other costs for the improvement, modification, operation and maintenance of school district facilities used by the charter school shall be subject to negotiation between the charter school and the district board.

A charter school shall be authorized to offer any educational program that may be offered by a school district unless expressly prohibited by its charter or by state law.

and (o) Repealed by Laws 2021 by ch. 169, § 4.

Admission to a charter school shall not be determined solely on academic abilities or achievements, including minimum test scores or intelligence quotient scores.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, § 3, effective April 22, 2021; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, added "to any student in grades kindergarten through twelve (12)" in (a); rewrote (b), which read, "A charter school shall be a public school within the school district that grants its charter and shall be accountable to the district board for purposes of ensuring compliance with applicable laws and charter provisions and the requirements of the state constitution"; added the last sentence in (c); in (d), substituted "authorizer" for "school district" in the first sentence, added the lst sentence; in the second sentence of (e), substituted "authorizer" for "school district," "authorizer" for "district district," "the" for "such" preceding "obligations"; in (f), substituted "authorizer" for "school district," deleted "for the purpose of enhancing the terms of any lease or financial obligation" at the end; in (g), deleted "Pursuant to contract" at the beginning, added the last sentence and made related changes; added (g)(i) through (g)(iii); in (j), substituted "community college or the university of Wyoming" for "state college or university" in the first sentence, added "the incremental" in the second sentence, added the third sentence; in (k), added "Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section," at the beginning, substituted "school district" for "the" in the second sentence and made a related change.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 3, added "to any student in grades kindergarten through twelve (12)" in the second sentence of (a).

Laws 2021, ch. 169, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 21, 2021.

The third 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (n), which read, "All decisions regarding the planning, siting and inspection of charter school facilities shall be made in accordance with law and as specified by contract with the district board"; and repealed (o), which read, "The school district shall be the owner of all records of the charter school, including student, staff and public affairs records of charter school operations. Upon closure of the charter school, all charter school records shall be promptly delivered to the school district."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act. —

See §

17-19-101

et seq.

§ 21-3-305.
Charter schools; contract contents; regulations.

An approved charter application shall serve as the basis for a contract between the charter school and the authorizer. The charter contract shall:

Be a written instrument which is a separate document from the charter application;

Be executed by an authorizer and a charter school;

Confer certain rights, privileges and obligations on the charter school;

Confirm the status of the charter school as a public school;

Be granted for five (5) years;

Provide for a review by the authorizer of the charter school’s performance, including the progress of the charter school in achieving the academic goals set forth in the charter, at least one (1) time in each five (5) year period that the charter is in effect;

Provide for renewal of the charter if the authorizer and the charter school agree to renew the charter pursuant to a renewal application. The renewal application shall meet the requirements of subsection (b) of this section;

Specify the grounds for the authorizer to:

Revoke the charter before the term for which the charter is granted;

Not renew a charter.

Set forth the methods by which the charter school will be held accountable for achieving the educational mission and goals of the charter school, including the following:

Evidence of adequate performance or improvement in:

Assessment measures, including the statewide assessment system measures;

Attendance rates;

Graduation rates, if applicable;

Statewide education accountability system measures;

Financial performance and stability; and

Governing board performance and stewardship, including compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, and charter terms.

Evidence of progress toward reaching the educational goals set by the charter school.

Describe the method to be used to monitor the charter school’s:

Compliance with applicable law; and

Progress in meeting targeted educational performance.

Specify that the authorizer and the charter school may amend the charter during the term of the charter by mutual consent and describe the process for amending the charter;

Describe specific operating requirements, including all the matters set forth in the application for the charter;

Specify dates for the charter school to:

Begin school operations; and

Have students attending the charter school.

Specify that records of a charter school relating to the school’s operation and the school’s charter are subject to inspection and copying to the same extent that records of a public school are subject to inspection and copying;

Specify that records provided by the charter school to the department or authorizer that relate to compliance by the charter school with the terms of the charter or applicable state or federal laws are subject to inspection and copying;

Require a charter school to set annual performance targets in conjunction with the charter school’s authorizer. The annual performance targets shall be designed to help each school meet applicable federal, state and authorizer requirements.

The contract between the charter school and the authorizer may be renewed pursuant to a renewal application. The renewal application shall:

Include any guidance provided by the authorizer specifying performance criteria that will guide the authorizer’s renewal decisions;

At a minimum, provide an opportunity for the charter school to:

Present evidence, beyond the data contained in the performance report, supporting charter renewal;

Describe improvements undertaken or planned for the charter school; and

Detail the charter school’s plans for the next charter term.

Be submitted by the governing board of a charter school seeking renewal not later than December 31 of the year preceding the start of the school year that the charter expires, under the renewal application guidance issued by the authorizer.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 2021 ch. 169, § 4.

The authorizer shall make a final ruling on the renewal application not later than April 1 following the filing of the renewal application under this subsection. The April 1 deadline does not apply to any review or appeal of a final ruling. If a school district denies renewal of a charter, the charter school board may appeal to the state loan and investment board for a de novo consideration of the renewal. The state loan and investment board shall consider the renewal and if the renewal is approved shall be the authorizer of the charter school.

After a charter school authorized by the state loan and investment board has been in operation for one (1) year or has been renewed by the state loan and investment board, the state loan and investment board may delegate to the school district where the charter school operates any of the functions of an authorizer under this article provided that:

The charter school and the school district approve the delegation of functions; and

The charter school shall retain the right to seek renewal of the charter from the state loan and investment board.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendments —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, in (a), substituted "authorizer" for "school district," added the second sentence; added (a)(i) through (a)(xvi); in (b), substituted "authorizer may be renewed pursuant to a renewal application" for "school district shall reflect all agreements regarding the release of the charter school from school district policies," added the second sentence; added (b)(i) through (b)(iii); and added (f) and (g).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (c), which read, "The contract between the charter school and the school district shall reflect all approved requests for release of the charter school from state statutes and regulations. Within ten (10) days after the contract is approved by the school district, any request for release from state statutes and regulations shall be delivered by the school district to the state board. Within forty-five (45) days after a request for release is received by the state board, the state board shall either grant or deny the request. If the state board grants the request, it may orally notify the school district and the charter school of its decision. If the state board denies the request, it shall notify the school district and the charter school in writing that the request is denied and specify the reasons for denial. If the school district and the charter school do not receive notice of the state board’s decision within forty-five (45) days after submittal of the request for release, the request shall be deemed granted. If the state board denies a request for release that includes multiple state statutes or regulations, the denial shall specify the state statutes and regulations for which the release is denied, and the denial shall apply only to those state statutes and regulations so specified"; repealed (d), which read, "A material revision of the terms of the contract shall be made only with the approval of the school district and the governing body of the charter school"; and repealed (e), which read, "The contract between the charter school and the school district shall provide that upon closure of the charter school any charter school assets purchased with public funds shall become the property of the school district."

§ 21-3-306.
Application for establishing charter schools; conversion of existing schools.

Any person may apply to an authorizer for the establishment of a new charter school. The applicant shall have the right to determine which authorizer to apply to and may apply to a different authorizer for renewal of a charter. The state loan and investment board may reject a renewal application from an existing charter school if the renewal is to avoid necessary corrective measures, including closure of the charter school, identified by the authorizer.

Administrators and teachers employed by the district, parents of students enrolled in the district and any special district advisory group comprised of district residents may apply to the district board to convert an existing public school operating within the school district to a charter school. An application filed under this subsection shall demonstrate the support of not less than fifty percent (50%) of the teachers employed by the school who teach at the school proposed to be converted, and the parents of fifty percent (50%) of all students attending the school proposed to be converted.

Instead of establishing a new charter school or a converted charter school under this section, a district board and a charter school applicant may by mutual agreement establish a charter school within a school. A charter school operated under this subsection is a separate school and shall have the rights and obligations provided under this article for new and converted charter schools. The agreement between the school board and the charter school may provide that faculty and staff at the charter school may work in both the charter school established under this subsection and other district schools. If district students attend both the charter school established under this subsection and another district school, the students shall be counted for each school in proportion to the percentage of their time spent in each school.

If a school district denies an application to convert a school to a charter school under subsection (b) of this section, the applicant may appeal to the state loan and investment board. If the state loan and investment board approves the application, it shall be the authorizer of the charter school.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (a), substituted "an authorizer" for "the district board," deleted "a charter school within a school to be located within the school district" at the end, added the second and third sentences; and added (d).